Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-984
Agreement.

(1) An eligible provider, as a condition of receiving supplemental reimbursement, shall enter into and maintain an agreement with the department for purposes of implementing the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act and reimbursing the department for the costs of administering the act.

(2) The nonfederal share of the supplemental reimbursement submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for purposes of claiming federal financial participation shall be paid only with funds from the governmental entities described in subdivision (3) of section 68-981 and certified to the department as provided in section 68-985.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 9.